Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1653HV (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 1053 Section 1. Section 422.11O, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2026 2029 . 3 Sec. 2. Section 422.11Y, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 4 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5 b. The designated rate of the tax credit is nine cents , 6 except that for calendar year 2028 the designated rate is four 7 and one-half cents . 8 Sec. 3. Section 422.11Y, subsections 7 and 9, Code 2025, are 9 amended to read as follows: 10 7. Any credit in excess of the retail dealerâs tax liability 11 shall be refunded , except any credit in excess of the retail 12 dealerâs tax liability for calendar year 2028 shall not be 13 refunded . In lieu of claiming a refund, if available, the 14 retail dealer may elect to have the overpayment shown on the 15 retail dealerâs final, completed return credited to the tax 16 liability for the following tax year. 17 9. This section is repealed January 1, 2026 2029 . 18 Sec. 4. Section 422.33, subsection 11D, paragraphs b and c, 19 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 20 b. Any E-15 plus gasoline promotion tax credit which is in 21 excess of the taxpayerâs tax liability shall be refunded as 22 provided in section 422.11Y, or may be shown on the taxpayerâs 23 final, completed return credited to the tax liability for the 24 following tax year in the same manner as provided in section 25 422.11Y . 26 c. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2026 2029 . 27 Sec. 5. Section 423.4, subsection 9, paragraph b, Code 2025, 28 is amended to read as follows: 29 b. The amount of the refund shall be calculated by 30 multiplying a designated rate by the total number of gallons 31 of biodiesel produced by the biodiesel producer in this state 32 during each quarter of a calendar year. The designated rate 33 shall be four and one-half cents. 34 Sec. 6. 2011 Iowa Acts, chapter 113, section 37, as amended 35 -1- LSB 1653HV (2) 91 jm/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 1053 by 2016 Iowa Acts, chapter 1106, section 3, and 2022 Iowa Acts, 1 chapter 1067, section 57, is amended to read as follows: 2 SEC. 37. TAX CREDIT AVAILABILITY. For a retail dealer who 3 may claim an E-15 plus gasoline promotion tax credit under 4 section 422.11Y or 422.33, subsection 11D , as enacted in this 5 Act and amended in subsequent Acts, in calendar year 2025 6 2028 , and whose tax year ends prior to December 31, 2025 2028 , 7 the retail dealer may continue to claim the tax credit in the 8 retail dealerâs following tax year. In that case, the tax 9 credit shall be calculated in the same manner as provided in 10 section 422.11Y or 422.33, subsection 11D , as enacted in this 11 Act and amended in subsequent Acts, for the remaining period 12 beginning on the first day of the retail dealerâs new tax year 13 until December 31, 2025 2028 . For that remaining period, the 14 tax credit shall be calculated in the same manner as a retail 15 dealer whose tax year began on the previous January 1 and who 16 is calculating the tax credit on December 31, 2025 2028 . 17